Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-2242
Credential holder; proof of credentials; issuance.

(1) The board shall provide to each credential holder proof that such person has been credentialed under the Real Property Appraiser Act for the classification requirements set forth in the act. The board shall also issue a pocket card in such size and form as it may approve.

(2) Each credential issued under the act shall designate the principal place of business of the credential holder.

(3) Proof of credentialing and pocket cards issued by the board shall remain the property of the state, and upon surrender, cancellation, suspension, or revocation, any person holding the documents shall immediately return such documents to the board.

Laws 1990, LB 1153, § 42;

Laws 1991, LB 203, § 46;

Laws 1994, LB 1107, § 43;

Laws 2001, LB 162, § 34;

Laws 2006, LB 778, § 63;

Laws 2007, LB186, § 23.